Illinois, session 104th, HB5545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 12-215 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/12-215)7    Sec. 12-215. Oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights on 8motor vehicles. Except as otherwise provided in this Code:9    (a) The use of red or white oscillating, rotating, or 10flashing lights, whether lighted or unlighted, is prohibited 11except on:12        1. Law enforcement vehicles of State, federal, or 13    local authorities;14        2. A vehicle operated by a police officer or county 15    coroner and designated or authorized by local authorities, 16    in writing, as a law enforcement vehicle; however, such 17    designation or authorization must be carried in the 18    vehicle;19        2.1. A vehicle operated by a fire chief, deputy fire 20    chief, assistant fire chief, or a chief of a Mutual Aid Box 21    Alarm System who has completed an emergency vehicle 22    operation training course approved by the Office of the 23    State Fire Marshal and designated or authorized by local   HB5545- 2 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    authorities, fire departments, fire protection districts, 2    or Mutual Aid Box Alarm Systems, in writing, as a fire 3    department, fire protection district, township fire 4    department, or Mutual Aid Aide Box Alarm System vehicle; 5    however, the designation or authorization must be carried 6    in the vehicle, and the lights may be visible or activated 7    only when responding to a bona fide emergency; 8        3. Vehicles of local fire departments and State or 9    federal firefighting vehicles;10        4. Vehicles which are designed and used exclusively as 11    ambulances or rescue vehicles; furthermore, such lights 12    shall not be lighted except when responding to an 13    emergency call for and while actually conveying the sick 14    or injured;15        4.5. Vehicles operated by an EMS chief that are 16    affixed with EMS chief special registration plates or 17    vehicles that which are occasionally used as rescue 18    vehicles that have been authorized for use as rescue 19    vehicles by a volunteer EMS provider, provided that the 20    operator of the vehicle has successfully completed an 21    emergency vehicle operation training course recognized by 22    the Department of Public Health; furthermore, the lights 23    shall not be lighted except when responding to an 24    emergency call for the sick or injured; 25        5. Tow trucks licensed in a state that requires such 26    lights; furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted on   HB5545- 3 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    any such tow truck while the tow truck is operating in the 2    State of Illinois;3        6. Vehicles of the Illinois Emergency Management 4    Agency, vehicles of the Office of the Illinois State Fire 5    Marshal, vehicles of the Illinois Department of Public 6    Health, vehicles of the Illinois Department of 7    Corrections, and vehicles of the Illinois Department of 8    Juvenile Justice;9        7. Vehicles operated by a local or county emergency 10    management services agency as defined in the Illinois 11    Emergency Management Agency Act;12        8. School buses operating alternately flashing head 13    lamps as permitted under Section 12-805 of this Code;14        9. Vehicles that are equipped and used exclusively as 15    organ transplant vehicles when used in combination with 16    blue oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights; 17    furthermore, these lights shall be lighted only when the 18    transportation is declared an emergency by a member of the 19    transplant team or a representative of the organ 20    procurement organization; 21        10. Vehicles of the Illinois Department of Natural 22    Resources that are used for mine rescue and explosives 23    emergency response;24        11. Vehicles of the Illinois Department of 25    Transportation identified as Emergency Traffic Patrol; the 26    lights shall not be lighted except when responding to an   HB5545- 4 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    emergency call or when parked or stationary while engaged 2    in motor vehicle assistance or at the scene of the 3    emergency; and4        12. Vehicles of the Illinois State Toll Highway 5    Authority with a gross vehicle weight rating of 9,000 6    pounds or more and those identified as Highway Emergency 7    Lane Patrol; the lights shall not be lighted except when 8    responding to an emergency call or when parked or 9    stationary while engaged in motor vehicle assistance or at 10    the scene of the emergency. 11    (b) The use of amber oscillating, rotating, or flashing 12lights, whether lighted or unlighted, is prohibited except on:13        1. Second division vehicles designed and used for 14    towing or hoisting vehicles; furthermore, such lights 15    shall not be lighted except as required in this paragraph 16    1; such lights shall be lighted when such vehicles are 17    actually being used at the scene of a crash or 18    disablement; if the towing vehicle is equipped with a flat 19    bed that supports all wheels of the vehicle being 20    transported, the lights shall not be lighted while the 21    vehicle is engaged in towing on a highway; if the towing 22    vehicle is not equipped with a flat bed that supports all 23    wheels of a vehicle being transported, the lights shall be 24    lighted while the towing vehicle is engaged in towing on a 25    highway during all times when the use of headlights is 26    required under Section 12-201 of this Code; in addition,   HB5545- 5 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    these vehicles may use white oscillating, rotating, or 2    flashing lights in combination with amber oscillating, 3    rotating, or flashing lights as provided in this 4    paragraph;5        2. Motor vehicles or equipment of the State of 6    Illinois, the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority, local 7    authorities, and contractors; furthermore, such lights 8    shall not be lighted except while such vehicles are 9    engaged in maintenance or construction operations within 10    the limits of construction projects;11        3. Vehicles or equipment used by engineering or survey 12    crews; furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted 13    except while such vehicles are actually engaged in work on 14    a highway;15        4. Vehicles of public utilities, municipalities, or 16    other construction, maintenance, or automotive service 17    vehicles except that such lights shall be lighted only as 18    a means for indicating the presence of a vehicular traffic 19    hazard requiring unusual care in approaching, overtaking, 20    or passing while such vehicles are engaged in maintenance, 21    service, or construction on a highway;22        5. Oversized vehicle or load; however, such lights 23    shall only be lighted when moving under permit issued by 24    the Department under Section 15-301 of this Code;25        6. The front and rear of motorized equipment owned and 26    operated by the State of Illinois or any political   HB5545- 6 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    subdivision thereof, which is designed and used for 2    removal of snow and ice from highways;3        6.1. The front and rear of motorized equipment or 4    vehicles that (i) are not owned by the State of Illinois or 5    any political subdivision of the State, (ii) are designed 6    and used for removal of snow and ice from highways and 7    parking lots, and (iii) are equipped with a snow plow that 8    is 12 feet in width; these lights may not be lighted except 9    when the motorized equipment or vehicle is actually being 10    used for those purposes on behalf of a unit of government; 11        7. Fleet safety vehicles registered in another state, 12    furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted except as 13    provided for in Section 12-212 of this Code;14        8. Such other vehicles as may be authorized by local 15    authorities;16        9. Law enforcement vehicles of State or local 17    authorities when used in combination with red oscillating, 18    rotating, or flashing lights;19        9.5. Propane delivery trucks;20        10. Vehicles used for collecting or delivering mail 21    for the United States Postal Service provided that such 22    lights shall not be lighted except when such vehicles are 23    actually being used for such purposes;24        10.5. Vehicles of the Office of the Illinois State 25    Fire Marshal, provided that such lights shall not be 26    lighted except for when such vehicles are engaged in work   HB5545- 7 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    for the Office of the Illinois State Fire Marshal; 2        11. Any vehicle displaying a slow-moving vehicle 3    emblem as provided in Section 12-205.1;4        12. All trucks equipped with self-compactors or 5    roll-off hoists and roll-on containers for garbage, 6    recycling, or refuse hauling. Such lights shall not be 7    lighted except when such vehicles are actually being used 8    for such purposes;9        13. Vehicles used by a security company, alarm 10    responder, control agency, or the Illinois Department of 11    Corrections;12        14. Security vehicles of the Department of Human 13    Services; however, the lights shall not be lighted except 14    when being used for security related purposes under the 15    direction of the superintendent of the facility where the 16    vehicle is located; and17        15. Vehicles of union representatives, except that the 18    lights shall be lighted only while the vehicle is within 19    the limits of a construction project.20    (c) The use of blue oscillating, rotating, or flashing 21lights, whether lighted or unlighted, is prohibited except on:22        1. Rescue squad vehicles not owned by a fire 23    department or fire protection district and vehicles owned 24    or operated by an EMS chief as provided in subsection (a); 25    a voluntary firefighter; a paid firefighter; a part-paid 26    firefighter; a call firefighter; a member of the board of   HB5545- 8 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    trustees of a fire protection district; a paid or unpaid 2    member of a rescue squad; a paid or unpaid member of a 3    voluntary ambulance unit; or a paid or unpaid member 4    members of a local or county emergency management services 5    agency as defined in the Illinois Emergency Management 6    Agency Act, designated or authorized by local authorities, 7    in writing, and carrying that designation or authorization 8    in the vehicle.9        However, such lights are not to be lighted except when 10    responding to a bona fide emergency or when parked or 11    stationary at the scene of a fire, rescue call, ambulance 12    call, or motor vehicle crash.13        Any person using these lights in accordance with this 14    subdivision (c)1 must carry on his or her person an 15    identification card or letter identifying the bona fide 16    member of a fire department, fire protection district, 17    rescue squad, ambulance unit, or emergency management 18    services agency that owns or operates that vehicle. The 19    card or letter must include:20            (A) the name of the fire department, fire 21        protection district, rescue squad, ambulance unit, or 22        emergency management services agency;23            (B) the member's position within the fire 24        department, fire protection district, rescue squad, 25        ambulance unit, or emergency management services 26        agency;  HB5545- 9 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1            (C) the member's term of service; and2            (D) the name of a person within the fire 3        department, fire protection district, rescue squad, 4        ambulance unit, or emergency management services 5        agency to contact to verify the information provided. 6        2. Police department vehicles in cities having a 7    population of 500,000 or more inhabitants.8        3. Law enforcement vehicles of State or local 9    authorities when used in combination with red oscillating, 10    rotating, or flashing lights.11        4. Vehicles of local fire departments and State or 12    federal firefighting vehicles when used in combination 13    with red oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights.14        5. Vehicles which are designed and used exclusively as 15    ambulances or rescue vehicles when used in combination 16    with red oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights; 17    furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted except when 18    responding to an emergency call.19        6. Vehicles that are equipped and used exclusively as 20    organ transport vehicles when used in combination with red 21    oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights; furthermore, 22    these lights shall only be lighted when the transportation 23    is declared an emergency by a member of the transplant 24    team or a representative of the organ procurement 25    organization.26        7. Vehicles of the Illinois Emergency Management   HB5545- 10 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    Agency, vehicles of the Office of the Illinois State Fire 2    Marshal, vehicles of the Illinois Department of Public 3    Health, vehicles of the Illinois Department of 4    Corrections, and vehicles of the Illinois Department of 5    Juvenile Justice, when used in combination with red 6    oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights.7        8. Vehicles operated by a local or county emergency 8    management services agency as defined in the Illinois 9    Emergency Management Agency Act, when used in combination 10    with red oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights.11        9. Vehicles of the Illinois Department of Natural 12    Resources that are used for mine rescue and explosives 13    emergency response, when used in combination with red 14    oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights. 15    (c-1) In addition to the blue oscillating, rotating, or 16flashing lights permitted under subsection (c), and 17notwithstanding subsection (a), a vehicle operated by a 18voluntary firefighter, a voluntary member of a rescue squad, 19or a member of a voluntary ambulance unit may be equipped with 20flashing white headlights and blue grill lights, which may be 21used only in responding to an emergency call or when parked or 22stationary at the scene of a fire, rescue call, ambulance 23call, or motor vehicle crash.24    (c-2) In addition to the blue oscillating, rotating, or 25flashing lights permitted under subsection (c), and 26notwithstanding subsection (a), a vehicle operated by a paid   HB5545- 11 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1or unpaid member of a local or county emergency management 2services agency as defined in the Illinois Emergency 3Management Agency Act, may be equipped with white oscillating, 4rotating, or flashing lights to be used in combination with 5blue oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights, if 6authorization by local authorities is in writing and carried 7in the vehicle.8    (d) The use of a combination of amber and white 9oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights, whether lighted or 10unlighted, is prohibited except on second division vehicles 11designed and used for towing or hoisting vehicles or motor 12vehicles or equipment of the State of Illinois, local 13authorities, contractors, and union representatives; 14furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted on second 15division vehicles designed and used for towing or hoisting 16vehicles or vehicles of the State of Illinois, local 17authorities, and contractors except while such vehicles are 18engaged in a tow operation, highway maintenance, or 19construction operations within the limits of highway 20construction projects, and shall not be lighted on the 21vehicles of union representatives except when those vehicles 22are within the limits of a construction project.23    (d-5) The use of green oscillating, flashing, or rotating 24lights, whether lighted or unlighted, is prohibited except on:25        1. Second division vehicles designed and used for 26    towing or hoisting vehicles when the lights on those   HB5545- 12 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    vehicles are used in combination with amber or amber and 2    white oscillating, flashing, or rotating lights; 3    furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted except when 4    such vehicles are actually being used at the scene of a 5    crash or disablement.6        2. Motor vehicles or equipment of the State of 7    Illinois when the lights on those vehicles or equipment 8    are used in combination with amber or amber and white 9    oscillating, flashing, or rotating lights; furthermore, 10    such lights shall not be lighted except while such 11    vehicles or equipment are engaged in maintenance 12    operations, snow and ice removal operations, or performing 13    traffic control and protection duties while at an 14    emergency scene.15        3. Motor vehicles of the Department of Transportation 16    identified as Emergency Traffic Patrol when the lights on 17    those vehicles are used in combination with red and white 18    oscillating, flashing, or rotating lights when responding 19    to an emergency call or when parked or stationary while 20    engaged in motor vehicle assistance or at an emergency 21    scene.22        4. Motor vehicles of the Illinois State Toll Highway 23    Authority when the lights on those vehicles are used in 24    combination with amber oscillating, flashing, or rotating 25    lights; furthermore, such lights shall not be lighted 26    except while such vehicles are engaged in maintenance   HB5545- 13 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    operations, snow and ice removal operations, or performing 2    traffic control and protection duties while at an 3    emergency scene.4        5. Motor vehicles of the Illinois State Toll Highway 5    Authority with a gross vehicle weight rating of 9,000 6    pounds or more and those identified as Highway Emergency 7    Lane Patrol when the lights on those vehicles are used in 8    combination with red and white oscillating, flashing, or 9    rotating lights when responding to an emergency call or 10    when parked or stationary while engaged in motor vehicle 11    assistance or at the scene of the emergency.12        6. Motor vehicles or equipment of local authority or 13    municipalities which perform highway maintenance 14    operations, when the lights on those vehicles are used in 15    combination with amber or amber and white oscillating, 16    flashing, or rotating lights; furthermore, such lights 17    shall not be lighted except while such vehicles are 18    engaged in the maintenance operations, snow and ice 19    removal operations, or performing traffic control and 20    protection duties while at an emergency scene.21        7. Fire department vehicles of local fire departments 22    and State or federal firefighting vehicles when the lights 23    on those vehicles are used in combination with red, or red 24    and white, or red and blue, oscillating, rotating, or 25    flashing lights.26        8. Vehicles used by a security company when the lights   HB5545- 14 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1    on those vehicles are used in combination with amber 2    oscillating, flashing, or rotating lights; furthermore, 3    such lights shall not be lighted except when the vehicle 4    is being operated upon the property or location where the 5    security company is employed to perform security or crime 6    prevention duties.7        9. Ambulances or rescue vehicles operating in counties 8    with populations of less than 2,000,000. 9        10. Motor vehicles or equipment used by contractors, 10    engineering or survey crews, or union representatives 11    engaged in work on a highway; furthermore, such lights 12    shall not be lighted except while the vehicles are 13    actually engaged in work on a highway. 14    (d-10) Fire department vehicles of local fire departments 15and State or federal firefighting vehicles, police vehicles of 16State, federal, or local authorities, and vehicles designated 17by local or State authority, while parked at an emergency 18scene, may use a steady-on illumination or steady-burn, or 19flashing green beacon or beacons if such steady-on, 20steady-burn, or flashing beacon is used to indicate an 21emergency operations command post or incident command 22location.23    (e) All oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights referred 24to in this Section shall be of sufficient intensity, when 25illuminated, to be visible at 500 feet in normal sunlight.26    (f) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a manufacturer   HB5545- 15 -LRB104 19460 LNS 32908 b1of oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights or his 2representative or authorized vendor from temporarily mounting 3such lights on a vehicle for demonstration purposes only. If 4the lights are not covered while the vehicle is operated upon a 5highway, the vehicle shall display signage indicating that the 6vehicle is out of service or not an emergency vehicle. The 7signage shall be displayed on all sides of the vehicle in 8letters at least 2 inches tall and one-half inch wide. A 9vehicle authorized to have oscillating, rotating, or flashing 10lights mounted for demonstration purposes may not activate the 11lights while the vehicle is operated upon a highway. 12    (g) Any person violating the provisions of subsection (a), 13(b), (c), (d), (d-5), or (d-10) of this Section who without 14lawful authority stops or detains or attempts to stop or 15detain another person shall be guilty of a Class 2 felony.16    (h) Except as provided in subsection (g) above, any person 17violating the provisions of subsection (a) or (c) of this 18Section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.19(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-667, eff. 1-1-25; 20104-81, eff. 1-1-26; 104-213, eff. 1-1-26; revised 11-21-25.)